Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.70.070

Public health and safety, general laws applicable.

Every code city may exercise the powers authorized and shall perform the duties imposed upon cities of like population relating to the public health and safety as provided by Title 70 RCW and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, shall: (1) Organize boards of health and appoint a health officer with the authority, duties and functions as provided in chapter 70.05 RCW, or provide for combined city-county health departments as provided and in accordance with the provisions of chapter 70.08 RCW; (2) contribute and participate in public health pooling funds as authorized by chapter 70.12 RCW; (3) control and provide for treatment of sexually transmitted diseases as authorized by chapter 70.24 RCW; (4) provide for the care and control of tuberculosis as provided in chapters 70.28, 70.30, and 70.54 RCW; (5) participate in health districts as authorized by chapter 70.46 RCW; (6) exercise control over water pollution as provided in chapter 35.88 RCW; (7) for all code cities having a population of more than twenty thousand serve as a primary district for registration of vital statistics in accordance with the provisions of chapter 70.58A RCW; (8) observe and enforce the provisions relating to fireworks as provided in chapter 70.77 RCW; (9) enforce the provisions relating to swimming pools provided in chapter 70.90 RCW; (10) enforce the provisions of chapter 18.20 RCW when applicable; (11) perform the functions relating to persons with mental illness prescribed in chapters 72.06 and 71.12 RCW; (12) cooperate with the state department of social and health services in mosquito control as authorized by RCW 70.22.060; and (13) inspect nursing homes as authorized by RCW 18.51.145.

[ 2019 c 148 s 34; 1987 c 223 s 4; 1985 c 213 s 12; 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 25; 1979 c 141 s 42; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.70.070.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Rule-making authority—2019 c 148: See RCW 70.58A.901 and 70.58A.902.

Savings—Effective date—1985 c 213: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Severability—Effective date—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 18.51.010.